Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5708YH (3) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2551 Section 1. Section 562A.9, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. Rent shall be payable without demand or notice at the 3 time and place agreed upon by the parties. If a landlord 4 applies a rent increase to the dwelling unit of a current 5 tenant, the percentage increase shall not be greater than 6 the percentage increase of the consumer price index for all 7 urban consumers in the midwest region over the previous twelve 8 months or the percentage increase of the property value of the 9 premises as determined by the county assessor for the same time 10 period since the last rent increase, whichever is higher. Each 11 tenant shall be notified, in writing, of any rent increase at 12 least ninety days before the effective date. Unless otherwise 13 agreed, rent is payable at the dwelling unit and periodic rent 14 is payable at the beginning of any term of one month or less 15 and otherwise in equal monthly installments at the beginning of 16 each month. Unless otherwise agreed, rent shall be uniformly 17 apportionable from day-to-day. 18 Sec. 2. Section 562B.14, subsection 7, Code 2026, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 7. If a landlord applies a rent increase to the mobile 21 home space of a current tenant, the percentage increase shall 22 not be greater than the percentage increase of the consumer 23 price index for all urban consumers in the midwest region over 24 the previous twelve months or the percentage increase of the 25 property value of the manufactured home community or the mobile 26 home park as determined by the county assessor for the same 27 time period since the last rent increase, whichever is higher. 28 Each tenant shall be notified, in writing, of any rent increase 29 at least ninety days before the effective date. Such effective 30 date shall not be sooner than the expiration date of the 31 original rental agreement or any renewal or extension thereof. 32